Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4129.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "nuclear and hydrogen graduate attraction and retention program act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Date of graduation" means the date an individual graduates as described in subdivision (i)(i). (b) "Department" means the department of labor and economic opportunity. (c) "Fund" means the nuclear and hydrogen graduate attraction and retention program fund created in section 11. (d) "Postsecondary school" means any degree- or certificate-granting public or private college or university, junior college, community college, or vocational or technical school. (e) "Program" means the nuclear and hydrogen graduate attraction and retention program created under section 5. (f) "Program participant" means a qualified individual who is accepted into the program. (g) "Qualified education program" means an instructional program that leads to a degree or credential that supports the nuclear industry, the hydrogen industry, or both, including, but not limited to, any skilled craft or engineering program that supports the design, construction, operation, or maintenance of an electricity-generating facility powered by nuclear or hydrogen energy. (h) "Qualified electric generation facility" means an electric generation facility or an electric generation plant located in this state that produces electricity using nuclear or hydrogen technology. (i) "Qualified individual" means an individual who meets both of the following requirements: (i) Graduates from an in-state or out-of-state postsecondary school with a degree or credential from a qualified education program. (ii) Accepts employment after graduation at a qualified electric generation facility in this state. Sec. 5. (1) The department shall create and administer the nuclear and hydrogen graduate attraction and retention program to provide grants to qualified individuals as described in this section. (2) The department shall develop a detailed application, approval, and compliance process for the program that is published and available on the department's website. (3) A qualified individual must apply not later than 12 months after the date of graduation to be eligible for the program. (4) Under the program, the department shall award a program participant a grant to be paid annually in equal installments for a period of 3 years. However, if the program participant ceases to be employed at a qualified electric generation facility in this state, the program participant is no longer eligible to receive an annual payment under this subsection. (5) The department shall not make a payment to a program participant under subsection (4) unless the program participant provides documentation to the department, in the form and manner prescribed by the department, that the program participant was employed at a qualified electric generation facility during the year to which the payment relates. Sec. 7. (1) If a program participant receives a payment under the program to which the program participant is not entitled, the program participant shall repay the payment to the department. (2) If a program participant receives a payment under the program to which the program participant is not entitled and does not repay the department as required under subsection (1), the attorney general may bring an action to collect the required repayment. (3) Repayments received under this section must be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the fund. Sec. 9. An individual who knowingly provides false information to the department in an application, request for payment, or documentation submitted under section 5 is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days, a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. Sec. 11. (1) The nuclear and hydrogen graduate attraction and retention program fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received under section 7 or from any other source in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) The department is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. (5) The department shall expend money from the fund, on appropriation, only for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) To administer the program. (b) To provide grant awards under the program. (c) To enforce violations of this act. Sec. 13. The department may promulgate rules to implement this act under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Sec. 15. (1) By October 31 of each year, the department shall submit a report regarding the status of the program to the chairperson of the senate appropriations committee, the chairperson of the senate energy and environment committee, the chairperson of the house of representatives appropriation committee, the chairperson of the house of representatives energy, communications, and technology committee, and the senate and house fiscal agencies. The report must include all of the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) The total number of program participants. (b) The number of program participants in each year of the 3-year period. (c) The number of program participants who completed the 3-year period. (d) The number of program participants who ceased to qualify for an annual payment because they are no longer employed at a qualified electric generation facility. (e) A breakdown of active program participants by nuclear industry or hydrogen industry. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Active program participant" means a program participant whose 3-year period has not ended. (b) "3-year period" means the 3-year period described in section 5(4). Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00154'25) or House Bill No. 4124 (request no. H00154'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00155'25) or House Bill No. 4127 (request no. H00155'25). (c) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00157'25) or House Bill No. 4125 (request no. H00157'25). (d) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00158'25) or House Bill No. 4126 (request no. H00158'25). (e) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01460'25) or House Bill No. 4128 (request no. H01460'25).